Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-225
Legislative declarations.

The Legislature declares that: (1) The provisions and regulations of the Barber Act are enacted in the interest of public health, public safety, and the general welfare; and (2) the skilled trade of barbering and the operation of barber shops is affected with a public interest.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 1, p. 554;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 10, p. 1058;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 96.